New York, session 2025-2026, S5810.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 21-a of the social services law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to read as follows: 3 (d) Any electronic benefit transfer system implemented pursuant to 4 this section shall include the automatic cancellation of an electronic 5 benefit transfer credit or debit card associated with such electronic 6 benefit transfer system when a benefit recipient reports fraudulent 7 activity relating to such credit or debit card. Such automatic cancella- 8 tion shall occur at the time a benefit recipient completes the procedure 9 set forth in paragraph (c) of subdivision two of this section, and at 10 such time a benefit recipient may apply for the replacement of a lost or 11 stolen credit or debit card pursuant to paragraph (d) of subdivision two 12 of this section. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 15 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 16 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 17 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10471-01-5